Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Penalties

11A.990.
Penalties — Time limitation on prosecution for violation of KRS 11A.040.

Any person who violates KRS

11A.040

shall be guilty of a Class D felony. In addition:

The judgment of conviction for a violation of KRS

11A.040

(2) shall recite that the offender is disqualified to hold office thereafter; and

Any person who violates KRS 11A.040(1) to (5) shall be judged to have forfeited any employment, or constitutional or statutory office he holds, provisions of KRS Chapter 18A to the contrary notwithstanding.

Any officer, public servant, or candidate required to file a statement of financial disclosure under KRS

11A.050

who does not file the statement by a date specified in that section shall have his salary withheld from the first day of noncompliance until he shall have completed the action required by law. The amount withheld shall be deducted from his overall pay and allowances and shall be recoverable upon the filing of the statement of financial disclosure. The commission may grant a reasonable extension of time for filing a statement of financial disclosure for good cause shown.

Any person who maliciously files with the commission a false charge of misconduct on the part of any public servant or other person shall be fined not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or imprisoned in a county jail for a term not to exceed one (1) year, or both.

Prosecution for violation of any provision of KRS

11A.040

shall not be commenced after four (4) years have elapsed from the date of the violation. Any executive agency lobbyist, employer, or real party in interest who violates any provision in KRS

11A.206

shall for the first violation be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000). For the second and each subsequent violation, he shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any executive agency lobbyist, employer, or real party in interest who fails to file the initial registration statement or updated registration statement required by KRS

11A.211

or

11A.216

, or who fails to remedy a deficiency in any filing in a timely manner, may be fined by the commission an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day, up to a maximum total fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

Any executive agency lobbyist, employer, or real party in interest who intentionally fails to register, or who intentionally files an initial registration statement or updated registration statement required by KRS

11A.211

or

11A.216

which he knows to contain false information or to omit required information shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

An executive agency lobbyist, employer, or real party in interest who files a false statement of expenditures or details of a financial transaction under KRS

11A.221

or

11A.226

is liable in a civil action to any official or employee who sustains damage as a result of the filing or publication of the statement.

Violation of KRS

11A.236

is a Class D felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 287, § 15, effective July 14, 1992; 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 55, effective September 16, 1993; 1996, ch. 172, § 8, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 602, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 603, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 475, § 8, effective July 14, 2000.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Since interjection of “legislative agent” in the middle of subsection (6) of this section, a statute dealing with executive agency lobbysists, is a palpable mistake, subsection (6) of this section must be read to say “executive agency lobbyist” instead of “legislative agent” and “executive lobbyist” in this section should be read as “executive agency lobbyist.”

OAG 94-40

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Cowan, The New Age of Ethics in Kentucky Government: What Every Lawyer Should Know, Vol. 58, No. 1, Winter 1994, Ky. Bench & Bar 33.